Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1170.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 11-594, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-594. Powers and duties of county medical examiner A. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall direct a death investigation and, on a determination that the circumstances of the death provide jurisdiction pursuant to section 11-593, subsection B, shall: 1. Take charge of the dead body. 2. Determine if an autopsy is required. 3. Certify to the cause and manner of death following completion of the death investigation, reduce the findings to writing and promptly make a full report on forms prescribed for that purpose. 4. Have subpoena authority for all documents, records and papers deemed useful in the death investigation. 5. Execute a death certificate provided by the state registrar of vital statistics indicating the cause and the manner of death for those bodies for which a death investigation has been conducted and jurisdiction is assumed. 6. Give approval for cremation or alkaline hydrolysis of a dead body after a death investigation and record the approval on the death certificate. 7. Notify the county attorney or other law enforcement authority when death is found to be from nonnatural causes. 8. Carry out the duties specified under section 28-668. 9. Carry out the duties specified under title 36, chapter 7, article 3. 10. Provide a blood sample from a deceased person for the purpose of communicable disease testing pursuant to sections 13-1210 and 36-670 if the blood is available and the collection or release will not interfere with a medical examination, autopsy or certification of death. 11. Observe all policies adopted by the board of supervisors regarding conflicts of interest and disclosure of noncounty employment. 12. Carry out the duties specified under section 13-3407, subsection F and section 13-3408, subsection J. B. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner may: 1. Assign to a medical death investigator or other qualified personnel all aspects of a death investigation except performing autopsies. 2. Authorize forensic pathologists to perform examinations and autopsies. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner may authorize medical students or residents and fellows in pathology training to perform autopsies under the supervision of a licensed physician who is board certified in forensic pathology, pursuant to procedures adopted by the county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. Authorization and the amount to be paid by the county for pathology services are subject to approval of the board of supervisors. 3. Authorize pathologist assistants to assist with performing autopsies under the direct supervision of a licensed physician who is board certified in forensic pathology, pursuant to procedures adopted by the county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. A pathologist assistant may not certify a cause of death or independently perform an autopsy. 4. Delegate any power, duty or function, whether ministerial or discretionary, vested by this chapter in the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner to a person meeting the qualifications prescribed in this chapter who is employed by or who has contracted with the county to provide death investigation services. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall be responsible for the official acts of the person designated pursuant to this section and shall act under the name and authority of the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. 5. Authorize the taking of organs and tissues as they prove to be usable for transplants, other treatment, therapy, education or research if all of the requirements of title 36, chapter 7, article 3 are met. The medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall give this authorization within a time period that allows a medically viable donation. 6. Authorize licensed physicians, surgeons or trained technicians to remove parts of bodies provided they follow an established protocol approved by the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner. 7. Limit the removal of organs or tissues for transplants or other therapy or treatment if, based on a review of available medical and investigative information within a time that allows a medically viable donation, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner makes an initial determination that their removal would interfere with a medical examination, autopsy or certification of death. Before making a final decision to limit the removal of organs, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall consult with the organ procurement organization. After the consultation and when the organ procurement organization provides information that the organ procurement organization reasonably believes could alter the initial decision and at the request of the organ procurement organization, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall conduct a physical examination of the body. If the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner limits the removal of organs, the medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall maintain documentation of this decision and shall make the documentation available to the organ procurement organization. C. A county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any acts performed in good faith pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 10 and subsection B, paragraphs 5, 6 and 7 of this section. D. If a dispute arises over the findings of the medical examiner's report, the medical examiner, on an order of the superior court, shall make available all evidence and documentation to a court-designated licensed forensic pathologist for review, and the results of the review shall be reported to the superior court in the county issuing the order. E. For providing external examinations and autopsies pursuant to this section, the medical examiner may charge a fee established by the board of supervisors pursuant to section 11-251.08. F. The county medical examiner or alternate medical examiner is entitled to all medical records and related records of a person for whom the medical examiner is required to certify cause of death.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 13-705, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-705. Dangerous crimes against children; sentences; definitions A. A person who is at least eighteen years of age and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or child sex trafficking and the person has previously been convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree shall be sentenced to imprisonment in the custody of the state department of corrections for natural life. A person who is sentenced to natural life is not eligible for commutation, parole, work furlough, work release or release from confinement on any basis for the remainder of the person's natural life. B. A person who is at least eighteen years of age and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving sexual assault of a minor who is twelve years of age or younger or sexual conduct with a minor who is twelve years of age or younger shall be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. This subsection does not apply to masturbatory contact. C. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving attempted first degree murder of a minor who is under twelve years of age, sexual assault of a minor who is under twelve years of age, sexual conduct with a minor who is under twelve years of age or manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor who is under twelve years of age may be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. If a life sentence is not imposed pursuant to this subsection, the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 13 years                20 years                27 years D. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving second degree murder of a minor who is under fifteen years of age may be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. If a life sentence is not imposed pursuant to this subsection, the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 25 years                30 years                35 years E. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving attempted first degree murder of a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, sexual assault of a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, taking a child for the purpose of prostitution, child sex trafficking, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor, sexual conduct with a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor who is twelve, thirteen or fourteen years of age, or involving or using minors in drug offenses, selling a dangerous drug pursuant to section 13-3407, subsection F or selling a narcotic drug pursuant to section 13-3408, subsection J shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 13 years                20 years                27 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 23 years                30 years                37 years F. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving aggravated assault, unlawful mutilation, molestation of a child, sexual exploitation of a minor, aggravated luring a minor for sexual exploitation, child abuse or kidnapping shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 10 years                17 years                24 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 21 years                28 years                35 years G. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a person is at least eighteen years of age or has been tried as an adult and is convicted of a dangerous crime against children involving luring a minor for sexual exploitation, sexual extortion or unlawful age misrepresentation and is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or is commuted, except that if the person is convicted of unlawful age misrepresentation the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 5 years                 10 years                15 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows and the person is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or is commuted, except that if the person is convicted of unlawful age misrepresentation the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 8 years                 15 years                22 years H. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a person is at least eighteen years of age or has been tried as an adult and is convicted of a dangerous crime against children involving sexual abuse or bestiality under section 13-1411, subsection A, paragraph 2 and is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 2.5 years               5 years                 7.5 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows and the person is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 8 years                 15 years                22 years I. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the first degree involving continuous sexual abuse of a child shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 39 years                60 years                81 years A person who has been previously convicted of one predicate felony shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment as follows: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 69 years                90 years                111 years J. The presumptive sentences prescribed in subsections C, D, E, F and I of this section or subsections G and H of this section if the person has previously been convicted of a predicate felony may be increased or decreased pursuant to section 13-701, subsections C, D and E. K. Except as provided in subsections G, H, M and N of this section, a person who is sentenced for a dangerous crime against children in the first degree pursuant to this section is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or commuted. L. A person who is convicted of any dangerous crime against children in the first degree pursuant to subsection C, D, E, F or I of this section and who has been previously convicted of two or more predicate felonies shall be sentenced to life imprisonment and is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served not fewer than thirty-five years or the sentence is commuted. M. Notwithstanding chapter 10 of this title, a person who is at least eighteen years of age or who has been tried as an adult and who is convicted of a dangerous crime against children in the second degree pursuant to subsection B, C, E, F or I of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony and if the person is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the term of imprisonment is as follows and the person is not eligible for release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted: Minimum                 Presumptive             Maximum 5 years                 10 years                15 years N. A person who is convicted of any dangerous crime against children in the second degree and who has been previously convicted of one or more predicate felonies is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except as specifically authorized by section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. O. Section 13-704, subsection J and section 13-707, subsection B apply to the determination of prior convictions. P. The sentence imposed on a person by the court for a dangerous crime against children under subsection H of this section involving sexual abuse may be served concurrently with other sentences if the offense involved only one victim. The sentence imposed on a person for any other dangerous crime against children in the first or second degree shall be consecutive to any other sentence imposed on the person at any time, including sexual abuse of the same victim. Q. In this section, for purposes of punishment an unborn child shall be treated like a minor who is under twelve years of age. R. A dangerous crime against children is in the first degree if it is a completed offense and is in the second degree if it is a preparatory offense, except attempted first degree murder is a dangerous crime against children in the first degree. S. It is not a defense to a dangerous crime against children that the minor is a person posing as a minor or is otherwise fictitious if the defendant knew or had reason to know the purported minor was under fifteen years of age. T. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Dangerous crime against children": (a) Means any of the following that is committed against a minor who is under fifteen years of age or against a person posing as a minor if the defendant knew or had reason to know that the purported minor was under fifteen years of age: (i) Second degree murder. (ii) Aggravated assault resulting in serious physical injury or involving the discharge, use or threatening exhibition of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument. (iii) Sexual assault. (iv) Molestation of a child. (v) Sexual conduct with a minor. (vi) Commercial sexual exploitation of a minor. (vii) Sexual exploitation of a minor. (viii) Child abuse as prescribed in section 13-3623, subsection A, paragraph 1. (ix) Kidnapping. (x) Sexual abuse. (xi) Taking a child for the purpose of prostitution as prescribed in section 13-3206. (xii) Child sex trafficking as prescribed in section 13-3212. (xiii) Involving or using minors in drug offenses. (xiv) Continuous sexual abuse of a child. (xv) Attempted first degree murder. (xvi) Sex trafficking. (xvii) Manufacturing methamphetamine under circumstances that cause physical injury to a minor. (xviii) Bestiality as prescribed in section 13-1411, subsection A, paragraph 2. (xix) Luring a minor for sexual exploitation. (xx) Aggravated luring a minor for sexual exploitation. (xxi) Unlawful age misrepresentation. (xxii) Unlawful mutilation. (xxiii) Sexual extortion as prescribed in section 13-1428. (xxiv) Selling a dangerous drug as prescribed in section 13-3407, subsection F. (xxv) Selling a narcotic drug as prescribed in section 13-3408, subsection J. (b) For the purposes of subdivision (a), items (vi) and (vii) of this paragraph, includes a visual depiction that is indistinguishable from an actual minor who is under fifteen years of age. 2. "Predicate felony" means any felony involving child abuse pursuant to section 13-3623, subsection A, paragraph 1, a sexual offense, conduct involving the intentional or knowing infliction of serious physical injury or the discharge, use or threatening exhibition of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or a dangerous crime against children in the first or second degree.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 13-3407, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3407. Possession, use, administration, acquisition, sale, manufacture or transportation of dangerous drugs; classification A. A person shall not knowingly: 1. Possess or use a dangerous drug. 2. Possess a dangerous drug for sale. 3. Possess equipment or chemicals, or both, for the purpose of manufacturing a dangerous drug. 4. Manufacture a dangerous drug. 5. Administer a dangerous drug to another person. 6. Obtain or procure the administration of a dangerous drug by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation or subterfuge. 7. Transport for sale, import into this state or offer to transport for sale or import into this state, sell, transfer or offer to sell or transfer a dangerous drug. B. A person who violates: 1. Subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section is guilty of a class 4 felony. Unless the drug involved is lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, amphetamine or phencyclidine or the person was previously convicted of a felony offense or a violation of this section or section 13-3408, the court on motion of the state, considering the nature and circumstances of the offense, for a person not previously convicted of any felony offense or a violation of this section or section 13-3408 may enter judgment of conviction for a class 1 misdemeanor and make disposition accordingly or may place the defendant on probation in accordance with chapter 9 of this title and refrain from designating the offense as a felony or misdemeanor until the probation is successfully terminated. The offense shall be treated as a felony for all purposes until the court enters an order designating the offense a misdemeanor. 2. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 3. Subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony, except that if the offense involved methamphetamine, the person is guilty of a class 2 felony. 4. Subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 5. Subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 6. Subsection A, paragraph 6 of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony. 7. Subsection A, paragraph 7 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. C. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, a person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1, 3 or 6 and who has not previously been convicted of any felony or who has not been sentenced pursuant to section 13-703, section 13-704, section 13-706, subsection A, section 13-708, subsection D or any other law making the convicted person ineligible for probation is eligible for probation. D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, if the aggregate amount of dangerous drugs involved in one offense or all of the offenses that are consolidated for trial equals or exceeds the statutory threshold amount, a person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2, 5 or 7 of this section is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. E. If the a person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2, 3, 4 or 7 of this section and the drug involved is methamphetamine, the person shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 5 calendar years       10 calendar years         15 calendar years A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2, 3, 4 or 7 of this section involving methamphetamine or section 13-3407.01 shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 10 calendar years      15 calendar years         20 calendar years F. If a person is convicted of selling a dangerous drug in violation of subsection A, paragraph 7 of this section, the victim of the offense was a minor and an initial autopsy finds that the cause of the minor's death resulted from complications of drug intoxication, overdose or the presence of a dangerous drug, the medical examiner shall order a second autopsy that is conducted by another county's medical examiner or an independent medical examiner who is a licensed physician.  If the medical examiner who conducts the second autopsy concludes that the dangerous drug that was sold to the minor contributed to the minor's death and that the minor would not have died but for the dangerous drug sold, the person shall be sentenced to the aggravated term of imprisonment, except that: 1. If the drug involved is methamphetamine, the defendant shall be sentenced to the maximum sentence authorized under subsection E of this section. 2. If the minor was under fifteen years of age, the defendant shall be sentenced to the maximum sentence authorized under section 13-705, subsection E. F. G. A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section or subsection A, paragraph 2, 3 or 7 of this section involving methamphetamine is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. G. H. If a person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section, if the drug is administered without the other person's consent, if the other person is under eighteen years of age and if the drug is flunitrazepam, gamma hydroxy butrate or ketamine hydrochloride, the convicted person is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. H. I. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by this title, the court shall order a person who is convicted of a violation of this section to pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars $1,000 or three times the value as determined by the court of the dangerous drugs involved in or giving rise to the charge, whichever is greater, and not more than the maximum authorized by chapter 8 of this title. A judge shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of any fine required by this subsection. I. J. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section for which probation or release before the expiration of the sentence imposed by the court is authorized is prohibited from using any marijuana, dangerous drug, narcotic drug or prescription-only drug except as lawfully administered by a health care practitioner and as a condition of any probation or release shall be required to submit to drug testing administered under the supervision of the probation department of the county or the state department of corrections, as appropriate, during the duration of the term of probation or before the expiration of the sentence imposed. J. K. If a person who is convicted of a violation of this section is granted probation, the court shall order that as a condition of probation the person perform not less than three hundred sixty hours of community restitution with an agency or organization that provides counseling, rehabilitation or treatment for alcohol or drug abuse, an agency or organization that provides medical treatment to persons who abuse controlled substances, an agency or organization that serves persons who are victims of crime or any other appropriate agency or organization. K. L. The presumptive term imposed pursuant to subsection E of this section may be mitigated or aggravated pursuant to section 13-701, subsections D and E.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 13-3408, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3408. Possession, use, administration, acquisition, sale, manufacture or transportation of narcotic drugs; classification A. Except as provided in section 36-2850, paragraph 19, subdivision (b), section 36-2852 and section 36-2853, subsection C, a person shall not knowingly: 1. Possess or use a narcotic drug. 2. Possess a narcotic drug for sale. 3. Possess equipment or chemicals, or both, for the purpose of manufacturing a narcotic drug. 4. Manufacture a narcotic drug. 5. Administer a narcotic drug to another person. 6. Obtain or procure the administration of a narcotic drug by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation or subterfuge. 7. Transport for sale, import into this state, offer to transport for sale or import into this state, sell, transfer or offer to sell or transfer a narcotic drug. B. A person who violates: 1. Subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section is guilty of a class 4 felony. 2. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 3. Subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony. 4. Subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 5. Subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. 6. Subsection A, paragraph 6 of this section is guilty of a class 3 felony. 7. Subsection A, paragraph 7 of this section is guilty of a class 2 felony. C. A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1, 3 or 6 of this section and who has not previously been convicted of any felony or who has not been sentenced pursuant to section 13-703, section 13-704, subsection A, B, C, D or E, section 13-706, subsection A, section 13-708, subsection D or any other provision of law making the convicted person ineligible for probation is eligible for probation. D. If the aggregate amount of narcotic drugs involved in one offense or all of the offenses that are consolidated for trial equals or exceeds the statutory threshold amount, a person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2, 5 or 7 of this section is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. E. A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 4 of this section is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the person has served the sentence imposed by the court, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. F. If the a person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 or 7 of this section and the violation involves the sale to another person of fentanyl in an amount of at least two hundred grams, the person shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 5 calendar years       10 calendar years         15 calendar years A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 or 7 of this section involving the sale to another person of fentanyl in an amount of at least two hundred grams shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 10 calendar years      15 calendar years         20 calendar years G. The presumptive term imposed pursuant to subsection F of this section may be mitigated or aggravated pursuant to section 13-701, subsections D and E. H. If the a person is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraphs 2 and 7 of this section and the violation involves the possession of fentanyl in a motor vehicle in an amount of at least two hundred grams, the person shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 5 calendar years       10 calendar years         15 calendar years A person who has previously been convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraphs 2 and 7 of this section involving the possession of fentanyl in a motor vehicle in an amount of at least two hundred grams shall be sentenced as follows: Minimum                Presumptive               Maximum 10 calendar years      15 calendar years         20 calendar years I. The presumptive term imposed pursuant to subsection H of this section may be mitigated or aggravated pursuant to section 13-701, subsections D and E. J. If a person is convicted of selling a narcotic drug in violation of subsection A, paragraph 7 of this section, the victim of the offense was a minor and an initial autopsy finds that the cause of the minor's death resulted from complications of drug intoxication, overdose or the presence of a narcotic drug, the medical examiner shall order a second autopsy that is conducted by another county's medical examiner or an independent medical examiner who is a licensed physician. if the medical examiner who conducts the second autopsy concludes that the narcotic drug that was sold to the minor contributed to the minor's death and that the minor would not have died but for the narcotic drug sold, the person shall be sentenced to the aggravated term of imprisonment, except that: 1. If the drug involved is fentanyl, the defendant shall be sentenced to the maximum sentence authorized under subsection F or H of this section. 2. If the minor was under fifteen years of age, the defendant shall be sentenced to the maximum sentence authorized under section 13-705, subsection E. J. K. In addition to any other penalty prescribed by this title, the court shall order a person who is convicted of a violation of this section to pay a fine of not less than $2,000 or three times the value as determined by the court of the narcotic drugs involved in or giving rise to the charge, whichever is greater, and not more than the maximum authorized by chapter 8 of this title. A judge shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of any fine required by this subsection. K. L. A person who is convicted of a violation of this section for which probation or release before the expiration of the sentence imposed by the court is authorized is prohibited from using any marijuana, dangerous drug, narcotic drug or prescription-only drug except as lawfully administered by a health care practitioner and as a condition of any probation or release shall be required to submit to drug testing administered under the supervision of the probation department of the county or the state department of corrections, as appropriate, during the duration of the term of probation or before the expiration of the sentence imposed. L. M. If a person who is convicted of a violation of this section is granted probation, the court shall order that as a condition of probation the person perform not less than three hundred sixty hours of community restitution with an agency or organization that provides counseling, rehabilitation or treatment for alcohol or drug abuse, an agency or organization that provides medical treatment to persons who abuse controlled substances, an agency or organization that serves persons who are victims of crime or any other appropriate agency or organization. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Short title This act may be cited as "Noah's Law".